Nevada, session 83, AB252.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 218F of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. The Office of Ombudsman for Legislative Employees is
hereby created in the Legislative Counsel Bureau, which consists
of the Ombudsman and such staff as the Ombudsman may
require.
2. The Legislative Commission shall appoint the Ombudsman
who is an employee of the Legislative Counsel Bureau.
3. The Office of Ombudsman for Legislative Employees
shall:
(a) Assist legislative employees in knowing and understanding
their rights and responsibilities as employees of the Legislative
Department.
(b) Assist legislative employees in finding a satisfactory
solution to conflicts in the workplace.
(c) Serve as a neutral mediator attempting to resolve concerns
or conflicts brought by or on behalf of a legislative employee
regarding issues in the workplace. Issues in the workplace
include, without limitation, concerns regarding equity in the
workplace and work-related conflicts amongst legislative
employees.
(d) Provide information to interested legislative employees
about services and programs available to legislative employees.
(e) Perform any other duties as directed by the Legislative
Commission.
4. The Ombudsman and any staff of the Office of
Ombudsman for Legislative Employees shall not disclose to a
member of the Legislature, the Director, a division chief or an
employee of the Legislative Department the identity or any
identifying information of a legislative employee seeking
assistance or information from the Office of Ombudsman for
-
*AB252*

– 3 –
Legislative Employees without the express permission of the
legislative employee.
5. The Ombudsman may not serve as a Deputy Director of the
Legislative Counsel Bureau.
Sec. 2. NRS 218F.100 is hereby amended to read as follows:
218F.100 1. There is hereby created the Legislative Counsel
Bureau, which consists of a Legislative Commission, an Interim
Finance Committee, an Office of Ombudsman for Legislative
Employees, a Director, an Audit Division, a Fiscal Analysis
Division, a Legal Division, a Research Division and an
Administrative Division.
2. The Ombudsman is the head of the Office of Ombudsman
for Legislative Employees.
3. The Legislative Auditor is the chief of the Audit Division.
[3.] 4. The Legislative Counsel and the General Counsel are
the chiefs of the Legal Division. The Director shall designate from
time to time the Legislative Counsel or the General Counsel or an
employee of the Legal Division to be responsible for the
administration of the Legal Division.
[4.] 5. The Research Director is the chief of the Research
Division.
[5.] 6. The Senate Fiscal Analyst and the Assembly Fiscal
Analyst are the chiefs of the Fiscal Analysis Division. The Director
shall designate from time to time one of the Fiscal Analysts or an
employee of the Fiscal Analysis Division to be responsible for the
administration of the Fiscal Analysis Division.
[6.] 7. The Legislative Commission shall appoint the Director.
The Director shall appoint the Chief of the Administrative Division
and the chiefs of the other divisions with the approval of the
Legislative Commission, and may serve as the chief of any division.
[7. The]
8. Except as otherwise provided in section 1 of this act, the
Director may, with the consent of the Legislative Commission,
designate one of the chiefs of the divisions or an employee of the
Legislative Counsel Bureau as the Deputy Director.
Sec. 3. NRS 218F.110 is hereby amended to read as follows:
218F.110 1. The Director serves as the executive head of the
Legislative Counsel Bureau and shall direct and supervise all of its
administrative and technical activities. The Ombudsman and chiefs
of the divisions of the Legislative Counsel Bureau shall perform the
respective duties assigned to them by law under the administrative
supervision of the Director.
2. The Director shall, consistent with the budget approved by
the Legislative Commission and within the limits of legislative
appropriations and other available funds, employ and fix the salaries
-
*AB252*

– 4 –
of or contract for the services of such professional, technical,
clerical and operational personnel and consultants as the execution
of the Director’s duties and the operation of the Legislative Counsel
Bureau may require.
3. All of the personnel of the Legislative Counsel Bureau are:
(a) Exempt from the provisions of chapter 284 of NRS.
(b) Entitled to such leaves of absence as the Legislative
Commission shall prescribe.
Sec. 4. NRS 218F.150 is hereby amended to read as follows:
218F.150 1. The Director and other officers and employees
of the Legislative Counsel Bureau shall not:
(a) Oppose or urge legislation, except as the duties of the
Ombudsman, the Director, the Legislative Auditor, the Legislative
Counsel, the General Counsel, the Research Director and the Fiscal
Analysts require them to make recommendations to the Legislature.
(b) Except as otherwise provided in this section, NRS 218D.130,
218D.135, 218D.250 and 353.211, disclose to any person outside
the Legislative Counsel Bureau the nature or content of any matter
entrusted to the Legislative Counsel Bureau, and such matter is
confidential and privileged and is not subject to discovery or
subpoena, unless the person entrusting the matter to the Legislative
Counsel Bureau requests or consents to the disclosure.
2. The nature or content of any work produced by the officers
and employees of the Research Division may be disclosed if or to
the extent that the disclosure does not reveal the identity of the
person who requested it or include any matter submitted by the
requester which has not been published or publicly disclosed.
3. The nature and content of any work produced by the officers
and employees of the Legal Division and the Fiscal Analysis
Division and any matter entrusted to those officers and employees to
produce such work are confidential and privileged and are not
subject to discovery or subpoena.
4. The nature and content of any work produced or
performed by, or any matter entrusted to, the Ombudsman and
staff of the Office of Ombudsman for Legislative Employees is
confidential and privileged and is not subject to discovery or
subpoena.
5. The provisions of subsections 1 [, 2 and 3] to 4, inclusive,
apply to any matter or work in any form, including, without
limitation, in any oral, written, audio, visual, digital or electronic
form, and such matter or work includes, without limitation, any
communications, information, answers, advice, opinions,
recommendations, drafts, documents, records, questions, inquiries or
requests in any such form.
-
*AB252*

– 5 –
[5.] 6. When a statute has been enacted or a resolution
adopted, the Legislative Counsel shall upon request disclose to any
person the state or other jurisdiction from whose law it appears to
have been adopted.
[6.] 7. The records of the travel expenses of Legislators and
officers and employees of the Legislature and the Legislative
Counsel Bureau are available for public inspection at such
reasonable hours and under such other conditions as the Legislative
Commission prescribes.
Sec. 5. 1. The Joint Interim Standing Committee on
Legislative Operations and Elections shall conduct a study during
the 2025-2026 interim concerning issues relating to legislative
employment.
2. In conducting the study, the Joint Interim Standing
Committee on Legislative Operations and Elections may enter into a
contract with a consultant.
3. The study must include, without limitation:
(a) An assessment of issues facing legislative employees in the
workplace, including, without limitation, workplace satisfaction and
challenges to work performance; and
(b) Input from legislative employees in the form of employee
surveys.
4. Not later than December 31, 2026, the Joint Interim
Standing Committee on Legislative Operations and Elections shall
prepare and submit a report of the findings of the study conducted
pursuant to subsection 1 to the Director of the Legislative Counsel
Bureau for transmittal to the Legislative Commission.
5. As used in this section, “legislative employee” means a
person who is employed by the Legislative Department.
Sec. 6. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
H
-
*AB252*